Georgia, session 2025_26, HB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to reconstitute the Board of Education of Catoosa County, Georgia, approved
March 30, 1993 (Ga. L. 1993, p. 4258), as amended, is amended by adding a new section to
read as follows:
"SECTION 8.1.
(a) The budget for the Catoosa County School District as finally amended and adopted by
the Catoosa County Board of Education must provide for all expenditures required by law
and for all debt service requirements for the ensuing fiscal year, and the total appropriations
from any fund shall not exceed the estimated fund balance, reserves, and revenues.
H. B. 31
- 1 -

LC 47 3135
(b) For any fiscal year in which the General Assembly through the General Appropriations
Act establishes a base amount for the Quality Basic Education Formula so as to achieve the
full funding of the applicable provisions of the Quality Basic Education Act, Article 6 of
Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the O.C.G.A., the budget provided for in subsection (a) of this
section shall be balanced without the expenditure of fiscal reserves.
(c) Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply in the event of declared states of
emergency or in the event that actual revenue received by the school district does not meet
anticipated revenue collections and the cause of such revenue shortfall is beyond the
control of the school district."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 31
- 2 -